Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5454XD (4) 91 nls/ko S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 509.3B Health savings accounts and 1 qualified high-deductible health plans ââ cost sharing. 2 If a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible paid as cost 3 sharing by an enrollee under this chapter may result in the 4 enrollee becoming ineligible for a health savings account 5 associated with the enrolleeâs qualified high-deductible 6 health plan under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, 7 the cost sharing shall apply only to the enrolleeâs qualified 8 high-deductible health plan after the enrollee satisfies the 9 enrolleeâs minimum deductible, except for items or services 10 determined to be preventive care under section 223(c)(2)(C) of 11 the Internal Revenue Code. 12 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 514A.3C Health savings accounts and 13 qualified high-deductible health plans ââ cost sharing. 14 If a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible paid as cost 15 sharing by an enrollee under this chapter may result in the 16 enrollee becoming ineligible for a health savings account 17 associated with the enrolleeâs qualified high-deductible 18 health plan under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, 19 the cost sharing shall apply only to the enrolleeâs qualified 20 high-deductible health plan after the enrollee satisfies the 21 enrolleeâs minimum deductible, except for items or services 22 determined to be preventive care under section 223(c)(2)(C) of 23 the Internal Revenue Code. 24